Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-908
Polls; when opened and closed; receipt of ballots; deadline.

(1) At all elections in the area of this state lying within the Mountain Standard or Mountain Daylight time zone, the polls shall open at 7 a.m. and close at 7 p.m. of the same day, and in the area lying within the Central Standard or Central Daylight time zone, the polls shall open at 8 a.m. and close at 8 p.m. of the same day.

(2) Except for special elections conducted by mail as provided in sections 32-952 to 32-959, the deadline for the receipt of ballots is 7 p.m. on the day set for the election in the area lying within the Mountain Standard or Mountain Daylight time zone and 8 p.m. on the day set for the election in the area lying within the Central Standard or Central Daylight time zone.

(3) If the judges and clerks of election are not present at the polls at the required hour, the polls may be opened by those placed in charge of the polling place at any time before the time required for closing the polls on election day.

(4) If at the hour of closing there are any persons desiring to vote who are in the polling place or in a line at the polling place and who have not been able to vote since appearing at the polling place, the polls shall be kept open reasonably long enough after the hour for closing to allow those present at that hour to vote. No person arriving after the hour when the polls have officially closed shall be entitled to vote.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 251;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 32;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 29.